st.aff
FLAG long
SFX yA Y 43
SFX yA ire ire/ lire # po:infi
SFX yA ire isant/ lire # po:ppre
SFX yA ire u/ lire # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX yA ire us/ lire # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX yA ire ue/ lire # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yA ire ues/ lire # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yA ire is/ lire # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yA ire it/ lire # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX yA ire isons/ lire # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX yA ire isez/ lire # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX yA ire isent/ lire # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX yA ire isais/ lire # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yA ire isait/ lire # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX yA ire isions/ lire # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX yA ire isiez/ lire # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX yA ire isaient/ lire # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX yA ire us/ lire # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yA ire ut/ lire # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX yA ire ûmes/ lire # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX yA ire ûtes/ lire # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX yA ire urent/ lire # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX yA ire irai/ lire # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX yA ire iras/ lire # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX yA ire ira/ lire # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yA ire irons/ lire # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX yA ire irez/ lire # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX yA ire iront/ lire # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX yA ire irais/ lire # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yA ire irait/ lire # po:cond po:3sg
SFX yA ire irions/ lire # po:cond po:1pl
SFX yA ire iriez/ lire # po:cond po:2pl
SFX yA ire iraient/ lire # po:cond po:3pl
SFX yA ire ise/ lire # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX yA ire ises/ lire # po:spre po:2sg
SFX yA ire usse/ lire # po:simp po:1sg
SFX yA ire usses/ lire # po:simp po:2sg
SFX yA ire ût/ lire # po:simp po:3sg
SFX yA ire ussions/ lire # po:simp po:1pl
SFX yA ire ussiez/ lire # po:simp po:2pl
SFX yA ire ussent/ lire # po:simp po:3pl
SFX yA ire is/ lire # po:impe po:2sg
SFX yA ire isons/ lire # po:impe po:1pl
SFX yA ire isez/ lire # po:impe po:2pl

SFX yB Y 43
SFX yB lire lire/ lire # po:infi
SFX yB lire lisant/ lire # po:ppre
SFX yB lire lu/ lire # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX yB lire lus/ lire # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX yB lire lue/ lire # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yB lire lues/ lire # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yB lire lis/ lire # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yB lire lit/ lire # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX yB lire lisons/ lire # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX yB lire lisez/ lire # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX yB lire lisent/ lire # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX yB lire lisais/ lire # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yB lire lisait/ lire # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX yB lire lisions/ lire # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX yB lire lisiez/ lire # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX yB lire lisaient/ lire # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX yB lire lus/ lire # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yB lire lut/ lire # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX yB lire lûmes/ lire # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX yB lire lûtes/ lire # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX yB lire lurent/ lire # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX yB lire lirai/ lire # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX yB lire liras/ lire # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX yB lire lira/ lire # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yB lire lirons/ lire # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX yB lire lirez/ lire # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX yB lire liront/ lire # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX yB lire lirais/ lire # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yB lire lirait/ lire # po:cond po:3sg
SFX yB lire lirions/ lire # po:cond po:1pl
SFX yB lire liriez/ lire # po:cond po:2pl
SFX yB lire liraient/ lire # po:cond po:3pl
SFX yB lire lise/ lire # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX yB lire lises/ lire # po:spre po:2sg
SFX yB lire lusse/ lire # po:simp po:1sg
SFX yB lire lusses/ lire # po:simp po:2sg
SFX yB lire lût/ lire # po:simp po:3sg
SFX yB lire lussions/ lire # po:simp po:1pl
SFX yB lire lussiez/ lire # po:simp po:2pl
SFX yB lire lussent/ lire # po:simp po:3pl
SFX yB lire lis/ lire # po:impe po:2sg
SFX yB lire lisons/ lire # po:impe po:1pl
SFX yB lire lisez/ lire # po:impe po:2pl

SFX yC Y 41
SFX yC ire ire/ dire # po:infi
SFX yC ire isant/ dire # po:ppre
SFX yC ire it/ dire # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX yC ire its/ dire # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX yC ire ite/ dire # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yC ire ites/ dire # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yC ire is/ dire # po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yC ire it/ dire # po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX yC ire isons/ dire # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX yC ire ites/ dire # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX yC ire isent/ dire # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX yC ire isais/ dire # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yC ire isait/ dire # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX yC ire isions/ dire # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX yC ire isiez/ dire # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX yC ire isaient/ dire # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX yC ire îmes/ dire # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX yC ire îtes/ dire # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX yC ire irent/ dire # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX yC ire irai/ dire # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX yC ire iras/ dire # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX yC ire ira/ dire # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yC ire irons/ dire # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX yC ire irez/ dire # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX yC ire iront/ dire # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX yC ire irais/ dire # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yC ire irait/ dire # po:cond po:3sg
SFX yC ire irions/ dire # po:cond po:1pl
SFX yC ire iriez/ dire # po:cond po:2pl
SFX yC ire iraient/ dire # po:cond po:3pl
SFX yC ire ise/ dire # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX yC ire ises/ dire # po:spre po:2sg
SFX yC ire isse/ dire # po:simp po:1sg
SFX yC ire isses/ dire # po:simp po:2sg
SFX yC ire ît/ dire # po:simp po:3sg
SFX yC ire issions/ dire # po:simp po:1pl
SFX yC ire issiez/ dire # po:simp po:2pl
SFX yC ire issent/ dire # po:simp po:3pl
SFX yC ire is/ dire # po:impe po:2sg
SFX yC ire isons/ dire # po:impe po:1pl
SFX yC ire ites/ dire # po:impe po:2pl

SFX yD Y 41
SFX yD dire dire/ dire # po:infi
SFX yD dire disant/ dire # po:ppre
SFX yD dire dit/ dire # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX yD dire dits/ dire # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX yD dire dite/ dire # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yD dire dites/ dire # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yD dire dis/ dire # po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yD dire dit/ dire # po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX yD dire disons/ dire # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX yD dire disez/ dire # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX yD dire disent/ dire # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX yD dire disais/ dire # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yD dire disait/ dire # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX yD dire disions/ dire # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX yD dire disiez/ dire # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX yD dire disaient/ dire # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX yD dire dîmes/ dire # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX yD dire dîtes/ dire # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX yD dire dirent/ dire # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX yD dire dirai/ dire # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX yD dire diras/ dire # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX yD dire dira/ dire # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yD dire dirons/ dire # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX yD dire direz/ dire # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX yD dire diront/ dire # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX yD dire dirais/ dire # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yD dire dirait/ dire # po:cond po:3sg
SFX yD dire dirions/ dire # po:cond po:1pl
SFX yD dire diriez/ dire # po:cond po:2pl
SFX yD dire diraient/ dire # po:cond po:3pl
SFX yD dire dise/ dire # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX yD dire dises/ dire # po:spre po:2sg
SFX yD dire disse/ dire # po:simp po:1sg
SFX yD dire disses/ dire # po:simp po:2sg
SFX yD dire dît/ dire # po:simp po:3sg
SFX yD dire dissions/ dire # po:simp po:1pl
SFX yD dire dissiez/ dire # po:simp po:2pl
SFX yD dire dissent/ dire # po:simp po:3pl
SFX yD dire dis/ dire # po:impe po:2sg
SFX yD dire disons/ dire # po:impe po:1pl
SFX yD dire disez/ dire # po:impe po:2pl
