st.dic
contredire/yD  # po:v3_it_q__a
dédire/yD  # po:v3__t_q__a
dire/yC  # po:v3__tnq__a
élire/yB  # po:v3__t____a
interdire/yD  # po:v3_it_q__a
lire/yA  # po:v3_itnq__a
prédire/yD  # po:v3_it_q__a
redire/yC  # po:v3__tn___a
réélire/yB  # po:v3__t____a
relire/yA  # po:v3_it_q__a
